tr: Giderilen saç boyası türü: Yarı kalıcı; Direkt; Kına; Kalıcı; Yarı kalıcı; Geçici; Canlı; Diğer
zh-TW: 去除的染髮劑類型: 護髮染; 直驅; 指甲花染髮; 永久型; 半永久染; 暫時; 生動; 其他
pl: Rodzaj usuwanej farby do włosów: Półtrwały; Bezpośrednia; Henna; Stała; Półtrwały; Tymczasowa; Jaskrawy; Inne
de: Entfernte Haarfärbungsart: Demi-permanent; Direkt; Henna; Permanent; Semi-permanent; Vorübergehend; Lebendig; Sonstiges
da: Fjernet hårfarvetype: Demi-permanent; Direkte; Henna; Permanent; Semi-permanent; Midlertidig; Levende; Andet
el: Τύπος βαφής μαλλιών που αφαιρείται: Ημιμόνιμη; Άμεσο; Χένα; Μόνιμο; Ημιπερμανέντ; Προσωρινός; Έντονο; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ odstraňovanej farby na vlasy: Demi-permanentná; Priamy; Henna; Trvalý; Semi-permanentná; Dočasný; Živý; Iné
zh-CN: 去除的染发类型: 半永久性; 直接; 指甲花; 永久性; 半永久性; 临时用; 生动; 其他
pt-BR: Tipo de tintura capilar removida: Semipermanente; Direto; Hena; Permanente; Semipermanente; Temporário; Vívido; Outro
bg-BG: Тип премахвана боя за коса: Полутраен; Директен; Къна; Постоянно; Полуперманентен; Временно; Ярък; Други
nb: Hårfargetype fjernet: Demi-permanent; Direkte; Henna; Permanent; Semi-permanent; Midlertidig; Levende; Annet
hu: Eltávolított hajfesték típusa: Féltartós; Közvetlen; Henna; Állandó; Féltartós színező; Ideiglenes; Élénk; Egyéb
sv: Typ av hårfärg som avlägsnas: Semipermanent; Direkt; Henna; Permanent; Semipermanent; Temporär; Levande; Övrigt
pt-PT: Tipo de tinta de cabelo removida: Semipermanente; Direta; Hena; Permanente; Semipermanente; Temporário; Vívido; Outro
ru: Тип удаляемой краски для волос: Деми-перманентная; Прямой; Хна; Постоянный; Полуперманентная; Временный; Яркий; Другой
nl: Type verwijderde haarverf: Demi-permanent; Direct; Henna; Permanent; Semi-permanent; Tijdelijk; Levendig; Andere
hr-HR: Vrsta uklonjene boje za kosu: Polutrajna; Izravno; Kana; Trajno; Polupermanentna; Privremeni; Živopisno; Ostalo
fi: Poistettu hiusvärin tyyppi: Puolipysyvä; Suora; Henna; Pysyvä; Puolipermanentti; Väliaikainen; Eloisa; Muu
es: Tipo de tinte de cabello eliminado: Semipermanente; Directo; Henna; Permanente; Semi-permanente; Temporal; Vívido; Otros
vi: Loại thuốc nhuộm tóc được loại bỏ: Bán vĩnh viễn; Trực tiếp; Lá móng; Vĩnh viễn; Tạm thời lâu; Tạm thời; Sống động; Khác
fr: Type de teinture capillaire éliminée: Demi-permanent; Direct; Henné; Permanent; Semi-permanent; Temporaire; Vif; Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta odstranjene barve za lase: Poltrajna; Neposredna; Kana; Trajna; Polpermanentna; Začasna; Živo; Drugo
lt-LT: Šalinami plaukų dažų tipai: Pusiau ilgalaikė; Tiesioginis; Chna; Įmontuoti; Pusiau permanentinė; Nuimamas; Ryškus; Kita
en: Hair dye type removed: Demi-permanent; Direct; Henna; Permanent; Semi-permanent; Temporary; Vivid; Other
ja: 除去対象の染毛タイプ: デミパーマネント; ダイレクト; ヘナ; 取り外し不可; セミパーマネント; 一時的; ビビッド; その他
th: ประเภทสีย้อมผมที่กำจัด: เดมิ-เพอร์มาเนนท์; เครื่องเล่นแผ่นเสียงแบบระบบขับตรง; เฮนนา; ถาวร; กึ่งถาวร; ชั่วคราว; สดใส; อื่นๆ
ko: 제거되는 헤어 염료 유형: 반영구; 다이렉트; 헤나; 영구; 준영구; 일시적인; 생생한; 기타
cs: Typ odstraněné barvy na vlasy: Demi-permanentní; Přímý; Henna; Permanentní; Semi-permanentní; Dočasné; Živý; Jiné
ro-RO: Tipul de vopsea de păr îndepărtată: Demi-permanent; Direct; Henna; Permanentă; Semi-permanent; Temporară; Vibrant; Altele
it: Tipo di tintura per capelli rimossa: Demi-permanente; Diretto; Henné; Permanenti; Semi-permanente; Temporaneo; Vivido; Altro